Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 14
CONTESTS

1-13.5-1401. Person elected - contest - causes.

The election of any person declared duly elected to any local government office may be contested by any eligible elector of the local government on the following grounds:

The contestee is not eligible for the office to which he or she has been declared elected;

Illegal votes have been received, or legal votes rejected, at the polls in sufficient numbers to change the results;

An error or mistake was made by any of the election judges, the designated election official, or the canvass board in counting or declaring the result of the election, if the error or mistake was sufficient to change the result;

Malconduct, fraud, or corruption occurred on the part of the election judges in any polling place, a canvass board member, or any designated election official or his or her assistant, if the malconduct, fraud, or corruption was sufficient to change the result; or

For any other cause that shows that another candidate was the legally elected person.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 54, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1402. District judge to preside - bond.

All contested election cases of local government officers shall be tried and determined in the district court of the county in which the local government is located. If the territorial boundaries of a local government overlap wholly or partially with more than one county, the district court of either county has jurisdiction. The style and form of process, the manner of service of process and papers, the fees of officers, and judgment for costs and execution shall be according to the rules and practices of the district court.

Before the district court is required to take jurisdiction of the contest, the contestor must file with the clerk of the court a bond, with sureties, to be approved by the district judge, running to the contestee and conditioned to pay all costs in case of failure to maintain his or her contest.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 54, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1403. Filing statement - contents.

The contestor shall file in the office of the clerk of the district court, within ten days after the expiration of the period within which a recount may be requested pursuant to section 1-13.5-1306, or within ten days after the conclusion of a recount conducted pursuant to section 1-13.5-1306, whichever is later, a written statement of the contestor's intention to contest the election and setting forth the name of the contestor, that the contestor is an eligible elector of the local government, the name of the contestee, the office contested, the time of election, and the particular causes of the contest. The statement must be verified by the affidavit of the contestor that the causes set forth in the statement are true to the best of the affiant's knowledge and belief.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 55, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1270, § 16, effective August 10.

1-13.5-1404. Summons - answer.

If the clerk of the district court receives a statement as set forth in section 1-13.5-1403, the clerk shall issue a summons in the ordinary form, naming the contestor as plaintiff and the contestee as defendant, stating the court in which the action is brought and a brief statement of the causes of contest, as set forth in the contestor's statement. The summons shall be served upon the contestee in the same manner as other summonses are served out of the district court.

The contestee, within ten days after the date of service of such summons, shall make and file an answer to the same with the clerk of the court in which the contestee shall either admit or specifically deny each allegation intended to be controverted by the contestee on the trial of such contest and shall set in that answer any counterstatement that he or she relies upon as entitling the contestee to the office to which he or she has been declared elected.

If the reception of illegal votes or the rejection of legal votes is alleged as the cause of the contest, a list of the persons who so voted or offered to vote must be set forth in the statement of the contestor and must be likewise set forth in the answer of the contestee if any such cause is alleged in his or her answer by way of counterstatement.

If the answer of the contestee contains new matter constituting a counterstatement, the contestor, within ten days after the filing of such answer, shall reply to the same, admitting or specifically denying, under oath, each allegation contained in such counterstatement intended by him or her to be controverted on the trial, and file the same in the office of the clerk of the district court.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 55, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1270, § 17, effective August 10.

1-13.5-1405. Trial and appeals.

Immediately after the joining of issue, the district court shall fix a date for the trial to commence, which date shall not be more than twenty days nor less than ten days after the joining of issue. The trial takes precedence over all other business in the court. The testimony may be oral or by depositions taken before any officer authorized to take depositions. Any depositions taken to be used upon the trial of such contest may be taken upon four days' notice. The district judge shall cause the testimony to be taken in full and filed in the cause. The trial of such causes must be conducted according to the rules and practice of the district court. Such proceedings may be reviewed and finally adjudicated by the supreme court of this state, if application to that court is made by either party and if the supreme court is willing to assume jurisdiction of the case.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 55, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1406. Recount.

If, upon the trial of any contested election under this article, the statement or counterstatement sets forth an error in canvass sufficient to change the result, the trial judge has the power to conduct a recount of the ballots cast or the votes tabulated on the voting machines in the precinct where the alleged error was made. The court may also require the production of witnesses, documents, records, and other evidence as may have or may contain information regarding the legality of any vote cast or counted for either of the contesting candidates or the correct number of votes cast for either candidate and may correct the canvass in accordance with the evidence presented and its findings.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 56, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1407. Judgment.

The court shall pronounce judgment whether the contestee or any other person was duly elected. The person so declared elected is entitled to the office upon qualification. If the judgment is against the contestee and he or she has received his or her certificate, the judgment annuls it. If the court finds that no person was duly elected, the judgment will be that the election be set aside and that a vacancy exists.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 56, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1408. Ballot questions and ballot issues - how contested.

The results of an election on any ballot question or ballot issue may be contested in the manner provided by this part 14. The grounds for such contest are those grounds set forth in section 1-13.5-1401 (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d). The contestee is the appropriate election official. In addition to other matters required to be set forth by this part 14, the statement of intention to contest the election must set forth the question contested.

Any contest arising out of a ballot issue or ballot question concerning the order on the ballot or concerning whether the form or content of any ballot title meets the requirements of section 20 of article X of the state constitution must be conducted as provided in section 1-11-203.5.

The result of an election on any ballot issue approving the creation of any debt or other financial obligation may be contested in the manner provided by this part 14. The grounds for such contest are those grounds set forth in sections 1-11-201 (4) and 1-13.5-1401 (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d). The contestee is the local government for which the ballot issue was decided.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 56, § 6, effective February 18.